public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ervađar arvađaren/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarense xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaresi/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaresiu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarion/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarionse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisen/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisense xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarision/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisionse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisié/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisiéu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarison/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarisonse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarié/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađariéu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarme/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaron/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaronse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarà/JNR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaràe/R xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarè/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarèmi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaré/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarémoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarésimo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarésimoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaréu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaría/JNR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaríami/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaríatu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaríe/JR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaríelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaríemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađarò/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaròmi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađase/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađasi xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađasta/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađaste/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađasti/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađasto/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađava/JPR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađavau/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađave/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađavi/NP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađavo/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađe xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađe/IJR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađede xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađege xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađemo xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađemo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađen/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađendo/E xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađene xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađense xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađese/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađesi xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađesta/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađeste/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađesti/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađesto/I xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađeva/JPR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađevau/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađeve/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađevi/NP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađevo/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađi xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađi/N xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađion/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađione xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađionse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisen/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisene xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisense xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađision/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisione xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisionse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisié/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisiéde/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisiége/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađison/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisone xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađisonse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađiven/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivense xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivion/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivionse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivié/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađiviéu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivon/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađivonse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađié/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađiéde/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađiége/P xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađiéu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađo/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađon/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađone xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađonse xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađà xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàa/JPR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàami/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàau/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàe/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađài/NP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàimo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàimoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàitu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàndome/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàndomene/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađào/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàomi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàrmene/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàsimo xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvami/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvimo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvimoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvitu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađàvomi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađè xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađè/FP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađème/H xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađèu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađé/FP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéa/JPR xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéami/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéau/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađée/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéi/NP xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéimo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéimoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéitu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađémoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéndome/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéndomene/G xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéo/J xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéomi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađésimo xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađéu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévami/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévimo/L xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévimoni/M xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévitu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvađévomi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvàđelo/S xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvàđeme/H xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvàđemi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvàđitu/O xnervađar
SFX A ervađar arvàđomi/K xnervađar
SFX A ervelar arvelada/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelade/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveladi/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelado/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelando/E [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelante [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelar/E [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaralo/S [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarami/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaratu/O [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarave/RT [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelare [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaremo/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaren/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaresi/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaresiu/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarion/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisen/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarision/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisié/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisiéu/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarison/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarié/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelariéu/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarme/G [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaron/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaronse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarà/JNR [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaràe/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarè/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarèmi/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaré/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarémoni/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarésimo/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarésimoni/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaréu/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaría/JNR [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríami/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríatu/O [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríe/JR [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríelo/S [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríemi/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarò/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaròmi/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelase/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasi [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasta/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaste/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasti/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasto/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelava/JPR [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelavau/Q [es]ŧervelar
