public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
inakuar/A
inalokar/A
anelar/A
arđentar/A
arsirar/A
aŧalar/A
axardar/A
bagaɉar/A
inbakukar/A
balkar/A
balukar/A
banpar/A
xbarbar/A
xbaroŧar/A
xbàter/A
inbaukir/A
befar/A
xbendar/A
inbéver/A
biankiđar/A
inkonbinar/A
bisakar/A
xboar/A
abokar/A
inbolponar/A
inbonbar/A
abordar/A
xboskar/A
dexboŧolar/A
bragetar/A
xbrasolar/A
xbrenar/A
xbriñar/A
xbrokar/A
brulegar/A
rabufar/A
inbutiliar/A
dexbuxolar/A
carlar/A
aparcèñer/A
inkoncéñer/A
ciɉar/A
cucar/A
damaskar/A
dekorar/A
determinar/A
diramar/A
dobar/A
indomar/A
adorar/A
indotar/A
kondurir/A
đavajar/A
konđónxer/A
sperđurar/A
enpir/A
ineskar/A
exentar/A
putrefar/A
faelar/A
kontrafaliar/A
desfantar/A
infatuar/A
edifegar/A
senplifegar/A
sfénder/A
proferir/A
dexfetar/A
sfiamegar/A
fidar/A
fikar/A
konfinar/A
sfiorir/A
infistegar/A
sfodegar/A
sfojar/A
refónder/A
informar/A
forŧar/A
frakasar/A
franŧexar/A
fraturar/A
sfregolar/A
infrisar/A
fruñolar/A
profumar/A
futiñar/A
galar/A
ingamelar/A
xgarar/A
xgardufar/A
ingavasar/A
gloriar/A
ingonbrar/A
ingoŧar/A
dexgranar/A
xgranfiñar/A
regraŧiar/A
ingremir/A
griliar/A
xgriŧar/A
ingrosir/A
xguanŧar/A
xguarnir/A
gustar/A
incensar/A
infioketar/A
inpiñatar/A
interesar/A
invenŧionar/A
exíɉer/A
xɉavetar/A
inɉotar/A
kair/A
kagar/A
kalefar/A
skalmanar/A
rekalŧitrar/A
kaneđar/A
inkankarir/A
deskantar/A
skapar/A
inkaponar/A
inkaratelar/A
deskarnaŧar/A
inkartar/A
skasir/A
katalogar/A
inkatramar/A
kauxar/A
inkaveŧar/A
klonar/A
inkogolar/A
inkokonar/A
kolpar/A
skomenŧiar/A
kondir/A
koniugar/A
konotar/A
kontrir/A
koñóser/A
okórer/A
inkordar/A
inkornar/A
kortiđar/A
koŧar/A
rekòxer/A
krestaliđar/A
krokar/A
krostolar/A
rekuadrar/A
skuercar/A
deskuinternar/A
deskular/A
kurar/A
akuxar/A
langorir/A
lapaŧar/A
latar/A
xlavinar/A
relegar/A
letarar/A
lexitimar/A
xlikar/A
liñar/A
sublokar/A
xlongar/A
luamar/A
perlustrar/A
maestrar/A
xmakar/A
xmanarar/A
inmanetar/A
mañar/A
markar/A
xmartelar/A
xmaserar/A
matir/A
maŧipar/A
međar/A
xmemorar/A
mentir/A
meretar/A
introméter/A
traxméter/A
minconar/A
misturar/A
mokar/A
moltiplegar/A
soramontar/A
amorbar/A
xmoroxar/A
mostar/A
remòver/A
mufar/A
murar/A
mutegar/A
nanarar/A
naufragar/A
negriđar/A
ninar/A
dexnonbolar/A
dexnuar/A
xñifar/A
odorar/A
inokular/A
ondar/A
opinar/A
dexordenar/A
orsar/A
manovrar/A
pacugar/A
paisar/A
despalar/A
palpar/A
inpanar/A
spanpanar/A
desparir/A
desparecar/A
despartir/A
inpasir/A
pasiđar/A
konpatir/A
rapatumar/A
spaviar/A
strapegar/A
spelatar/A
spenelar/A
pendolar/A
pensionar/A
perir/A
sperlongar/A
pestuñar/A
petolar/A
inpeŧar/A
spianar/A
piatolar/A
spierar/A
inpinir/A
piotar/A
spironar/A
spiumar/A
aplàuder/A
polejar/A
inpolverar/A
espóner/A
supóner/A
inpontir/A
spontonar/A
portar/A
desposesar/A
inpotacar/A
predegar/A
prestar/A
raprexentar/A
sprofondar/A
provokar/A
inpupar/A
putelar/A
rabotar/A
rajar/A
ranfar/A
ranŧiñar/A
skoraŧar/A
recolar/A
relaŧionar/A
restelar/A
ríder/A
inriŧar/A
robakiar/A
prorogar/A
romàñer/A
korónper/A
derotar/A
ruđenir/A
rumar/A
ruxar/A
konsagrar/A
sakramentar/A
salmistrar/A
salvar/A
insaorir/A
saŧiar/A
scantiđar/A
secar/A
sekondar/A
suseguir/A
segurar/A
seleđar/A
insenbrar/A
strasentir/A
desepelir/A
sèrver/A
sfaltar/A
siamar/A
desimilar/A
sioperar/A
sixilar/A
skaolar/A
skarpinar/A
skaturir/A
skinkar/A
skoređar/A
skrimiatolar/A
skuamar/A
soɉar/A
soleɉar/A
somejar/A
soñar/A
sorseɉar/A
spalmar/A
inspaxemar/A
spenotar/A
respetar/A
despigolar/A
spiritar/A
respónder/A
spruŧar/A
sotostar/A
instalar/A
stanŧiar/A
istekir/A
destilar/A
institikir/A
stokar/A
storpiar/A
stransir/A
stríder/A
destropar/A
strupiar/A
stuđar/A
persuàder/A
suɉerir/A
insuperbir/A
suŧar/A
retajar/A
intakar/A
tanbarar/A
tapar/A
tariđar/A
tastar/A
tàxer/A
desténder/A
strainténder/A
tentinagar/A
intratèñer/A
desoterar/A
tetar/A
toir/A
stonfar/A
tortiɉar/A
estràer/A
trankuilar/A
straviar/A
tridolar/A
trotar/A
tutelar/A
reŧeđar/A
inŧernir/A
ŧimar/A
ŧoetar/A
unir/A
vagabondar/A
xvaporar/A
stravéder/A
xvénder/A
konveñir/A
rinvèñer/A
versar/A
travestir/A
invinar/A
revíver/A
revoler/A
ravòlxer/A
xbacar/A
inxeñatolar/A
xlapañar/A
xufruir/A
